hyph_hr_HR.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NEXTLEVEL
.a1d
.a1f
.a1k
.a1l
.a1m
.a1n
.a1p
.a1r
.a1t
.a1u
.bi1
.e1l
.e1u
.i1d
.i1m
.i2s1
.i2z1
.o1k
.o1l
.o1m
.o1n
.o1r
.o1s
.o1v
.o1č
.o2d1
.o2t1
.u1b
.u1d
.u1g
.u1k
.u1l
.u1m
.u1n
.u1p
.u1r
.u1t
.u1v
.u2s1
.u2z1
1ba.
1ca.
1ce.
1da.
1diš
1do.
1fek
1ga.
1ja.
1je.
1ji.
1ju.
1ka.
1ki.
1ko.
1la.
1le.
1li.
1lo.
1ma.
1me.
1mo.
1na.
1ni.
1no.
1on.
1pa.
1ra.
1ri.
1ro.
1sa.
1ta.
1te.
1teh
1ti.
1to.
1va.
1vi.
1vo.
1za.
1zis
1ća.
1će.
1ći.
1ča.
1če.
1čić
1čiš
1ša.
1še.
a1ba
a1bo
a1bu
a1ca
a1ci
a1es
a1fi
a1fo
a1ga
a1ge
a1go
a1ha
a1hi
a1ho
a1hu
a1ju
a1ka
a1ke
a1ki
a1ko
a1lo
a1lu
a1ma
a1mi
a1mo
a1mu
a1ne
a1ni
a1nu
a1ob
a1ok
a1on
a1pi
a1po
a1pu
a1ra
a1ri
a1ro
a1ru
a1so
a1te
a1ti
a1to
a1tu
a1uk
a1ur
a1uz
a1va
a1vi
a1vo
a1ze
a1ća
a1će
a1ći
a1ča
a1če
a1či
a1ču
a1đa
a1đe
a1ša
a1še
a1ši
a1ža
a1že
a1ži
ab1l
ag1l
ak1l
ak1n
ak1s
al1t
am1j
am1p
an1c
an1j
an1k
an1t
ap1l
ar1b
ar1d
ar1h
ar1k
ar1m
ar1s
ar1t
as1k
as1p
at1n
at1s
av1k
av1l
av1n
az1b
az1d
az1g
az1m
az1n
ač1k
ač1n
aš1k
aš1n
aš1t
aš1ć
až1n
b1ni
c1nu
d1ba
d1la
d1li
d1lj
d1ma
d1me
d1mi
d1na
d1ne
d1ni
d1nj
d1no
d1st
d1ve
e1al
e1at
e1ba
e1bi
e1bo
e1ca
e1ce
e1ci
e1ga
e1ge
e1go
e1gu
e1ha
e1in
e1is
e1iz
e1ja
e1ka
e1ke
e1ki
e1ku
e1li
e1lo
e1lu
e1ma
e1me
e1mi
e1na
e1ni
e1no
e1nu
e1pa
e1pe
e1po
e1pu
e1ri
e1se
e1si
e1so
e1su
e1ud
e1ug
e1um
e1up
e1us
e1ut
e1uz
e1va
e1ve
e1vi
e1vo
e1za
e1ze
e1će
e1ći
e1ča
e1če
e1či
e1đe
e1đi
e1đu
e1ša
e1še
e1ši
e1že
ed1b
ed1n
ed1s
ek1c
ek1t
ek1v
el1n
en1j
en1k
en1s
en1t
en1z
ep1t
er1g
er1k
er1m
er1n
er1s
er1t
er1v
er1z
et1k
et1l
et1s
et1v
ev1n
ez1d
eč1n
eš1k
eš1n
eš1t
ež1n
g1lj
g1nu
h1ni
h1nu
h1ta
i1ba
i1be
i1bi
i1bo
i1bu
i1ca
i1ce
i1ci
i1do
i1fe
i1fi
i1ga
i1gi
i1go
i1gu
i1ha
i1ho
i1ja
i1je
i1ji
i1ju
i1ka
i1ko
i1ku
i1le
i1li
i1lo
i1mi
i1mo
i1na
i1ne
i1ni
i1no
i1nu
i1on
i1oz
i1pe
i1pi
i1po
i1re
i1ri
i1ta
i1te
i1ti
i1to
i1tu
i1va
i1ve
i1vi
i1vo
i1ća
i1će
i1ča
i1če
i1či
i1ša
i1še
i1ši
i1ža
i1že
ij1s
ik1t
in1g
in1j
in1k
ir1k
ir1n
iv1n
ič1k
ič1n
iš1n
k1nu
k1sp
k1st
k1ta
k1te
k1ti
l1ka
l1ni
l1sk
l1ti
l1tu
m1ba
m1bo
m1sk
n1ca
n1ci
n1da
n1dr
n1du
n1ga
n1ge
n1gi
n1ka
n1ko
n1sk
n1ti
n1tn
n1to
n1zi
n1či
ne1e
ne1i
ne1p
o1cr
o1fa
o1fe
o1fi
o1fo
o1gi
o1go
o1gu
o1ha
o1ho
o1id
o1in
o1iz
o1je
o1ka
o1ke
o1ki
o1ko
o1le
o1lu
o1mi
o1mo
o1mu
o1no
o1ro
o1sa
o1se
o1su
o1um
o1va
o1ve
o1vi
o1vo
o1ze
o1zo
o1đe
o1še
o1ši
o1že
o1ži
o1žu
od1b
od1n
od1s
oj1n
om1l
ov1n
ož1n
p1ka
p1ni
p1ta
p1ti
r1ba
r1bi
r1bo
r1ce
r1da
r1de
r1di
r1go
r1hi
r1ka
r1ki
r1ku
r1li
r1me
r1mo
r1na
r1ni
r1no
r1si
r1ta
r1tu
r1vi
r1vo
r1za
r1zo
r1če
r1či
r1ša
r1še
r1ši
s1ci
s1le
s1me
s1ni
s1no
s1nu
s1pu
t1ka
t1ko
t1kr
t1lj
t1lo
t1nj
t1nu
t1pi
t1po
t1pr
u1al
u1ca
u1ci
u1ha
u1ir
u1ju
u1la
u1le
u1li
u1me
u1na
u1pa
u1tu
u1će
u1ći
u1ža
u1že
ub1l
uk1t
un1d
un1j
up1n
ur1n
uš1k
už1n
v1ka
v1lj
v1ni
v1no
v1sk
z1ba
z1bu
z1da
z1di
z1ga
z1gl
z1go
z1gr
z1ja
z1la
z1le
z1li
z1ma
z1mi
z1ne
z1ni
z1nu
z1ve
z1vi
z1vr
ć1ni
č1ka
č1ki
č1ni
š1ka
š1lj
š1ni
š1nj
š1to
š1tv
š1ća
š1će
š1ći
š1ča
š1če
ž1ba
ž1lj
ž1ni
ž1nj
.a1mo
.a1na
.a1ni
.a1po
.a1ra
.a1ri
.al2o1
.al2u1
.an1t
.b2i2o1
.ba1l
.be2s1
.be2z1
.bi1l
.bo1g
.de1s
.do1b
.do1k
.do1m
.do1p
.do1s
.eg2o1
.ek1s
.ek2o1
.ep2i1
.g2e2o1
.im1p
.in1d
.in1s
.in1t
.in2o1
.is1k
.is1p
.is1t
.iz1b
.iz1d
.iz1g
.iz1l
.iz1m
.iz1n
.iz1r
.iz1u
.iz1v
.iz2o1
.ka1l
.ka1m
.ka1p
.ka1r
.ko1l
.ko1m
.ko1n
.ko1p
.ko1r
.ko1s
.m2i2o1
.ma1l
.ma1t
.me1đ
.n2e2o1
.na1b
.na1g
.na1k
.na1l
.na1m
.na1o
.na1p
.na1r
.na1s
.na1t
.na1u
.na1v
.na2d1
.ne1a
.ne1d
.ne1e
.ne1i
.ne1k
.ne1m
.ne1n
.ne1p
.ne1r
.ne1s
.ne1u
.ne1v
.ne1z
.no1v
.o1ko
.o1ku
.o1ma
.o1ne
.o1ri
.o1si
.ob1a
.ob1e
.ob1i
.ob1j
.ob1l
.ob1o
.ob1r
.ob1u
.od1a
.od1g
.od1l
.od1m
.od1o
.od1r
.od1s
.od1u
.od1v
.op1a
.op1e
.op1i
.op1o
.op1r
.op1s
.op1t
.os1m
.os1v
.ot1e
.ot1k
.ot1p
.ot1r
.pa2n1
.pe1r
.pe1t
.po1b
.po1g
.po1j
.po1k
.po1l
.po1m
.po1n
.po1p
.po1r
.po1s
.po1t
.po1v
.po1z
.po2d1
.ra2s1
.ra2z1
.re1a
.re1d
.re1z
.sa1m
.sk2i1
.so2c1
.su1p
.t2e2o1
.u1da
.u1do
.u1go
.u1ko
.u1mi
.u1na
.u1po
.u1ra
.u1re
.u1ta
.u1to
.u1ve
.ug1l
.un2i1
.us1k
.us1p
.us1t
.ve1l
.vi1s
.vi1š
.vo1d
.z2o2o1
.za1b
.za1d
.za1g
.za1k
.za1l
.za1m
.za1o
.za1p
.za1r
.za1t
.za1v
1ben.
1dan.
1dar.
1den.
1div.
1jac.
1jak.
1jan.
1jen.
1jer.
1jiv.
1kan.
1kav.
1lac.
1lan.
1lav.
1len.
1lik.
1log.
1man.
1men.
1nac.
1nak.
1nar.
1nat.
1nik.
1nin.
1nut.
1rac.
1rak.
1ran.
1rat.
1rač.
1ren.
1rij.
1ski.
1tak.
1tan.
1tar.
1tav.
1ten.
1ter.
1tet.
1tik.
1tiv.
1tor.
1tvo.
1vac.
1van.
1vač.
1ven.
1vit.
1zam.
1ćen.
1čak.
1čan.
1čar.
1čen.
1čić.
1đen.
1šen.
1žen.
a1bav
a1bij
a1bil
a1bit
a1bor
a1cij
a1cio
a1dat
a1dav
a1dic
a1dit
a1est
a1fij
a1gan
a1gat
a1god
a1gon
a1gor
a1gov
a1jat
a1juć
a1ka.
a1kat
a1kon
a1kov
a1kup
a1lak
a1lan
a1len
a1li.
a1lic
a1lif
a1lij
a1lin
a1lit
a1liz
a1liš
a1lo.
a1log
a1mar
a1mat
a1men
a1mer
a1met
a1mij
a1min
a1mir
a1mit
a1mor
a1mos
a1mot
a1nae
a1nal
a1nat
a1nic
a1nij
a1nim
a1nin
a1nis
a1nit
a1niz
a1nov
a1nut
a1oni
a1pad
a1par
a1pat
a1pit
a1por
a1pos
a1ra.
a1rac
a1rak
a1rat
a1ren
a1ric
a1rij
a1rin
a1ris
a1rit
a1riv
a1riz
a1rod
a1sat
a1sit
a1ta.
a1tat
a1tel
a1ter
a1ti.
a1tij
a1tik
a1tin
a1tir
a1tit
a1tiv
a1tiz
a1tič
a1ton
a1tor
a1tur
a1ust
a1va.
a1vac
a1vaj
a1val
a1van
a1var
a1vat
a1ven
a1vic
a1vij
a1vin
a1vit
a1vič
a1vrš
a1zat
a1ziv
a1ćat
a1ćen
a1ćiv
a1ča.
a1čen
a1čin
a1čit
a1čiv
a1čun
a1đan
a1đen
a1điv
a1šen
a1šit
a1šiv
a1ža.
a1žen
a1žit
a1živ
ab1lj
ad1nj
ad1ra
ad1ri
ag1la
ak1lo
ak1nu
ak1te
al1ja
al1jk
am1je
an1ci
an1di
an1ja
an1je
an1ji
an1ka
an1ko
an1st
an1ta
an1ti
an1tn
an1to
ap1la
ap1ra
ap1re
ap1ri
ar1di
ar1hi
ar1ka
ar1st
as1je
as1ka
as1ko
as1li
as1no
as1pa
as1po
as1pr
as1ta
as1te
as1ti
as1tu
at1ko
at1ni
at1ri
at1sk
av1la
av1lj
av1ni
av1no
az1ni
az1no
ač1ka
ač1ki
ač1ni
aš1ni
aš1nj
aš1ti
aš1tv
až1ni
b1lja
bo1go
c1nut
ci1on
d1ba.
d1lji
d1nev
d1ni.
d1nik
d1nja
d1nos
d1sje
e1ali
e1bat
e1bit
e1cat
e1cij
e1dij
e1din
e1dit
e1dov
e1gal
e1gat
e1gov
e1han
e1isp
e1ist
e1kat
e1kom
e1kor
e1kov
e1kul
e1lan
e1len
e1li.
e1lic
e1lij
e1lik
e1lin
e1lit
e1lič
e1lov
e1mat
e1men
e1mij
e1min
e1mit
e1na.
e1nac
e1nad
e1nap
e1nas
e1net
e1ni.
e1nic
e1nij
e1nik
e1nit
e1nič
e1nov
e1nut
e1par
e1pat
e1pod
e1por
e1pos
e1pot
e1poz
e1rac
e1ral
e1ran
e1ras
e1rat
e1rav
e1raz
e1ren
e1ret
e1ric
e1rij
e1rik
e1rir
e1rit
e1riv
e1riz
e1rič
e1sat
e1sel
e1set
e1seč
e1sij
e1sio
e1sit
e1siv
e1ta.
e1tar
e1ter
e1tik
e1til
e1tin
e1tir
e1tit
e1tiz
e1tod
e1tog
e1ton
e1val
e1van
e1vat
e1ver
e1vet
e1vin
e1vit
e1vol
e1za.
e1zan
e1zat
e1zij
e1ziv
e1ćen
e1ći.
e1ćiv
e1čat
e1čen
e1čer
e1čit
e1đen
e1điv
e1šen
e1šit
e1žen
ed1je
ed1na
ed1ni
ed1no
ek1ci
ek1si
ek1ti
ek1to
el1ji
el1ni
en1ci
en1ja
en1je
en1ji
en1ka
en1sk
en1ta
en1ti
en1tn
en1tr
en1zi
ep1lj
ep1re
er1ma
er1mi
er1na
er1ni
er1vi
er1zi
et1ka
et1lj
et1lo
et1ra
et1ri
et1sk
et1ve
ev1ni
eč1ni
eš1ni
eš1ta
ež1ni
g1nut
h1nut
i1ber
i1bil
i1ca.
i1cat
i1ce.
i1cij
i1cio
i1cir
i1dat
i1fer
i1fic
i1fik
i1gur
i1ja.
i1jac
i1jan
i1jar
i1jat
i1jav
i1je.
i1jeb
i1jed
i1jek
i1jel
i1jem
i1jen
i1jep
i1jer
i1jes
i1jet
i1jev
i1ječ
i1jeđ
i1ješ
i1ji.
i1ka.
i1kac
i1kal
i1kan
i1kat
i1kov
i1kul
i1lac
i1lat
i1lic
i1lir
i1liz
i1lič
i1liš
i1lo.
i1los
i1ma.
i1mal
i1mat
i1met
i1mir
i1mit
i1na.
i1nac
i1nal
i1nam
i1nan
i1nar
i1nat
i1nic
i1nir
i1nit
i1niz
i1nut
i1ona
i1oni
i1ozn
i1pat
i1raj
i1ran
i1rat
i1ren
i1ris
i1rit
i1riv
i1rod
i1sok
i1tac
i1tal
i1tan
i1tar
i1tat
i1tel
i1ter
i1ti.
i1tij
i1tir
i1tis
i1tiv
i1tič
i1tor
i1vac
i1val
i1van
i1vat
i1vač
i1ven
i1vij
i1vir
i1vit
i1viz
i1vot
i1zac
i1zir
i1zič
i1čan
i1čar
i1čav
i1čit
ij1sk
ik1nu
in1ja
in1je
in1ji
ir1ni
is1li
iv1ni
iz1le
iz1nu
iz1vi
ič1ki
ič1ni
iš1lj
iš1ni
iš1nj
iš1te
iš1tv
k1nut
k1tat
k1ter
k1tiv
l1jka
l1jni
l1ni.
l1nij
l1ski
l1tur
la1vo
m1lja
m1per
m1pir
m1ski
me1đu
n1cij
n1dar
n1dus
n1je.
n1ka.
n1ski
n1stv
n1tac
n1tal
n1tar
n1ter
n1tif
n1tik
n1tir
n1tni
n1tra
ne1do
ne1is
ne1iz
ne1po
ne1um
ne1up
ne1us
ne1ut
neo1b
neo1d
neo1p
nep1r
o1bio
o1cen
o1dir
o1dit
o1diš
o1gen
o1gij
o1god
o1gov
o1idn
o1ist
o1jav
o1jač
o1jed
o1jek
o1jit
o1kal
o1kat
o1kaz
o1kol
o1kop
o1kor
o1kul
o1lar
o1laz
o1let
o1lič
o1lom
o1lov
o1lum
o1lup
o1lus
o1lut
o1man
o1mat
o1men
o1mer
o1met
o1mic
o1mij
o1min
o1mis
o1mit
o1miš
o1mor
o1moć
o1mun
o1nac
o1nes
o1nic
o1nij
o1nir
o1nit
o1niz
o1nom
o1nos
o1pad
o1pul
o1ra.
o1rab
o1rac
o1ral
o1ran
o1rat
o1rav
o1raz
o1rač
o1red
o1ren
o1rez
o1ric
o1rij
o1rin
o1rir
o1rit
o1riz
o1rič
o1riš
o1rod
o1ruč
o1ruž
o1sam
o1sij
o1sit
o1tat
o1tin
o1tiv
o1tur
o1umn
o1val
o1van
o1var
o1vat
o1vač
o1vic
o1vij
o1vin
o1vit
o1vod
o1vol
o1vor
o1zel
o1zic
o1zit
o1ziv
o1ća.
o1čin
o1čit
o1đen
o1šen
o1žen
o1žit
o1živ
od1ne
od1ni
od1st
oj1ni
ol1ja
ol1ju
on1je
or1ti
ot1ka
ot1ko
ot1ni
ot1pi
ov1lj
ov1ni
ož1ni
p1lje
p1lji
p1ni.
po1lu
pod1v
pre1o
pre1u
r1cat
r1din
r1gan
r1ka.
r1kat
r1mal
r1man
r1mat
r1mir
r1ni.
r1nic
r1nij
r1nik
r1nut
r1stv
r1tat
r1tir
r1vat
r1ven
r1zij
r1čat
r1šav
r1šen
r1žav
re1ko
re1ob
ri1po
rl1ja
ro1tu
ru1ko
s1kat
s1kav
s1kiv
s1kre
s1nic
s1nik
s1nut
s1pit
s1pol
s1pra
s1pro
s1tik
s1tič
s1tos
s1tov
t1kov
t1kri
t1lja
t1nik
t1nič
t1nja
t1nut
t1ver
ta1ro
u1ali
u1aln
u1bit
u1cat
u1cij
u1cio
u1dit
u1hat
u1ira
u1juć
u1kat
u1kav
u1kov
u1lac
u1lar
u1lat
u1li.
u1lir
u1men
u1mer
u1min
u1mir
u1nat
u1pat
u1pit
u1por
u1ra.
u1rat
u1rir
u1rit
u1tan
u1tat
u1ti.
u1tij
u1tit
u1vat
u1će.
u1ći.
u1čit
u1čiv
u1điv
u1šat
u1šen
u1šit
u1žen
u1žit
u1živ
ub1li
ub1lj
ul1ja
ul1tu
un1da
un1ja
up1ni
ur1ni
us1po
uš1ka
už1ni
v1ječ
v1ka.
v1lja
v1lje
v1lji
v1ni.
v1nij
v1nik
v1ski
z1dan
z1gla
z1gov
z1gra
z1mje
z1ni.
z1nut
z1vod
za1go
za1ku
zi1on
č1ki.
č1ni.
č1nij
š1lja
š1ni.
š1nja
š1nji
š1tat
š1te.
š1tvo
š1ćan
š1ćen
š1ćiv
ž1lji
ž1ni.
ž1nic
ž1nij
ž1nja
.aer2o1
.afr2o1
.agr2o1
.akr2o1
.akv2a1
.alt2o1
.an1ti
.aut2o1
.auz2o1
.av2i2o1
.bar2o1
.bje1l
.bo1go
.cit2o1
.dec2i1
.dek2a1
.dem2o1
.dij2a1
.dor2o1
.egz2o1
.ek1sp
.end2o1
.etn2o1
.eur2o1
.fer2o1
.fil2o1
.fit2o1
.fon2o1
.fot2o1
.gon2o1
.hem2o1
.her2o1
.hip2o1
.hir2o1
.hom2o1
.ind2o1
.inf2o1
.is1kr
.is1pr
.is1to
.is1tr
.iz1ra
.jed1n
.kat2a1
.kil2o1
.kin2o1
.ko1lo
.ko1mp
.ko1nt
.kr2i2o1
.kri2m1
.lit2o1
.log2o1
.me1đu
.meg2a1
.mel2o1
.met2a1
.mez2o1
.mid2i1
.mil2i1
.min2i1
.mon2o1
.mot2o1
.na1pu
.nan2o1
.ne1do
.ne1is
.ne1iz
.ne1ko
.ne1na
.ne1po
.ne1ra
.ne1za
.neo1b
.neo1d
.neo1p
.nep1r
.net2o1
.no1vo
.ob1ra
.ort2o1
.par2a1
.pat2o1
.ped2o1
.pir2o1
.po1lu
.pod1r
.pod1s
.pod1v
.pol2i1
.pos1l
.pos1t
.pot1k
.pot1p
.pra1v
.pre1b
.pre1g
.pre1k
.pre1m
.pre1n
.pre1o
.pre1p
.pre1s
.pre1v
.pre1z
.pre2d1
.pre2t1
.pri1j
.pri1k
.pri1l
.pri1m
.pri1p
.pri1s
.pri1t
.pri1v
.pro1b
.pro1d
.pro1g
.pro1k
.pro1l
.pro1m
.pro1p
.pro1s
.pro1t
.pro1v
.ras1k
.ras1p
.ras1t
.raz1b
.raz1d
.raz1g
.raz1l
.raz1m
.raz1r
.raz1v
.rin2o1
.rot2o1
.rus2o1
.sa1mo
.ser2o1
.sol2o1
.sta1r
.tah2i1
.tar2a1
.tel2e1
.top2o1
.vaz2o1
.vi1so
.vi1še
.za1pa
.zas1t
.čet1v
.žir2o1
1kast.
1list.
1nast.
1nist.
1stvo.
1telj.
1čast.
a1lac.
a1list
a1nac.
a1nin.
a1ren.
a1telj
a1tor.
a1vac.
a1ćen.
a1čen.
a1đen.
a1šen.
a1žen.
ad1ni.
aj1ni.
al1jen
al1jka
al1ni.
an1je.
an1jen
an1ka.
an1ski
an1stv
an1tni
ar1ni.
ar1ski
ar1stv
as1ni.
as1ti.
at1ni.
at1ski
av1lja
av1lje
av1lji
av1ni.
az1ni.
ač1ki.
ač1ni.
aš1nji
aš1tvo
až1ni.
b1ljen
ba1ti.
bi1ti.
bil1ni
ca1ti.
cen1tr
ci1ja.
d1ljiv
d1nik.
da1ti.
di1ca.
di1ti.
diš1nj
e1nik.
e1ren.
e1tar.
e1čen.
e1đen.
ed1ni.
ed1nik
el1jen
en1je.
en1jen
en1ski
en1tni
er1ni.
es1ni.
es1ti.
et1lji
et1ni.
et1ski
ev1ni.
ga1ti.
gi1ja.
go1diš
go1vor
ha1ti.
i1jen.
i1lac.
i1nac.
i1ran.
i1telj
i1tet.
i1vac.
i1vač.
i1ven.
i1zam.
i1čar.
id1ni.
ij1ski
il1ni.
in1ja.
in1ka.
in1ski
is1ni.
is1tič
iv1ni.
ič1ki.
ič1ni.
iš1ni.
iš1nji
iš1te.
iš1tvo
ja1ti.
ja1ča.
jal1ni
jan1sk
je1li.
je1ti.
je1čen
jed1ni
jed1no
jen1je
jen1ji
jep1lj
jer1ni
jes1ni
jes1ti
jet1ni
ješ1ta
ji1ca.
ji1ti.
ji1vač
ju1ći.
ka1ti.
kin1ja
kup1lj
l1jni.
l1ski.
la1ti.
la1žen
lar1ni
li1ca.
li1ja.
li1ji.
li1na.
li1ti.
li1zam
lis1ti
lič1ni
liš1te
lja1ti
lja1va
lje1ni
ljen1j
lji1va
lji1vi
lov1lj
m1ski.
ma1ti.
me1tar
men1ta
met1ri
mi1ja.
mi1ti.
miš1lj
n1ski.
n1stvo
n1tni.
na1ti.
nal1ni
nep1re
nep1ri
nep1ro
ni1ca.
ni1ja.
ni1ji.
ni1ka.
ni1ti.
ni1zam
ni1čar
nis1ti
nič1ki
nič1ni
niš1tv
nos1ni
nu1ti.
nu1će.
o1jen.
o1lik.
o1log.
o1ren.
o1vac.
o1vit.
o1čen.
o1đen.
o1žen.
od1ni.
oj1ni.
or1ni.
